apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="outbid__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ding</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ding</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ding</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="r/un__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>un</l>
        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>un</l>
        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>uns</l>
        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>an</l>
        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>un</l>
        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>unning</l>
        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>unning</l>
        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>unning</l>
        <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="outsh/ine__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ine</l>
        <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ine</l>
        <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ines</l>
        <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>one</l>
        <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>one</l>
        <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ining</l>
        <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ining</l>
        <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ining</l>
        <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sho/ot__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ot</l>
        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ot</l>
        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ots</l>
        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>t</l>
        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>t</l>
        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>oting</l>
        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>oting</l>
        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>oting</l>
        <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="plan__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ned</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ned</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ning</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ning</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ning</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prov/e__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="th/ink__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ink</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ink</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inks</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ought</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>inking</l>
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="think" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="think so" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>so</l><r><g><b/>so</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="think that" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>that</l><r><g><b/>that</g></r></p></e>
                            <e r="RL" i=""><i>sho</i><par n="sho/ot__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>the<b/>dark</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>the<b/>dark</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="twin" i=""><i>twin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="run for" i=""><i>r</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/><p><l><b/>for</l><r><g><b/>for</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="run over" i=""><i>r</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/><p><l><b/>over</l><r><g><b/>over</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="run helter-skelter" i=""><i>r</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/><p><l><b/>helter-skelter</l><r><g><b/>helter-skelter</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="machine-gun" i=""><i>machine-gun</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="stun" i=""><i>stun</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="shed light on" i=""><i>shed</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/><p><l><b/>light<b/>on</l><r><g><b/>light<b/>on</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="ban" i=""><i>ban</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="bid" i=""><i>bid</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="fan" i=""><i>fan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pin" i=""><i>pin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="plan" i=""><i>plan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="prove" i=""><i>prov</i><par n="prov/e__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="run" i=""><i>r</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="rid" i=""><i>rid</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="scan" i=""><i>scan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="shed" i=""><i>shed</i><par n="outbid__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="shoot" i=""><i>sho</i><par n="sho/ot__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="shun" i=""><i>shun</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="sin" i=""><i>sin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="think" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="think so" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>so</l><r><g><b/>so</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="think that" i=""><i>th</i><par n="th/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>that</l><r><g><b/>that</g></r></p></e>
                            <e r="RL" i=""><i>sho</i><par n="sho/ot__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>the<b/>dark</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>the<b/>dark</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="thin" i=""><i>thin</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="rerun" i=""><i>rer</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="span" i=""><i>span</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="apportion" i=""><i>apportion</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="overrun" i=""><i>overr</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/></e>
